data/english.aff
SET ISO8859-2
FORBIDDENWORD !
ONLYROOT ~
WORDCHARS -_

SFX n Y 1
SFX n 0 es [^o]o <SING3>>  

SFX i Y 1
SFX i 0 s [^o]o <SING3>>  

SFX k Y 2
SFX k 0 s' [^o]o <PLUR><POSS>>  
SFX k 0 s [^o]o <PLUR>>  

SFX u Y 5
SFX u 0 's [ck][^s] <POSS>>  
SFX u 0 's [^ck]. <POSS>>  
SFX u 0 ' nce <POSS>>  
SFX u 0 ' [ck]s <POSS>>  
SFX u 0 ' s <POSS>>  

SFX h Y 1
SFX h 0 0 . >  

SFX g Y 1
SFX g e ing ge <PART>>  

SFX d Y 6
SFX d y ied [^aeiou]y <PAST><?PART>>  
SFX d 0 ed [bcdfgklmnprstvwxyz]c <PAST><?PART>>  
SFX d 0 ked [aeiou]c <PAST><?PART>>  
SFX d 0 ed [aeiou]y <PAST><?PART>>  
SFX d 0 ed [xw] <PAST><?PART>>  
SFX d e ed e <PAST><?PART>>  

SFX c Y 14
SFX c e ing [^ieg]e <PART>>  
SFX c 0 es [^c]s <SING3>>  
SFX c 0 s [^sc]h <SING3>>  
SFX c y ies [bcdfgklmnprstvwxyz]y <SING3>>  
SFX c 0 es [sc]h <SING3>>  
SFX c 0 s [aeiou]y <SING3>>  
SFX c 0 s oo <SING3>>  
SFX c 0 es x <SING3>>  
SFX c 0 s [^shoxy] <SING3>>  
SFX c 0 ing [xyw] <PART>>  
SFX c 0 ing [bcdfgklmnprstvwxyz]c <PART>>  
SFX c 0 king [aeiou]c <PART>>  
SFX c 0 ing ee <PART>>  
SFX c ie ying ie <PART>>  

SFX e Y 14
SFX e 0 zing [^z]z <PART>>  
SFX e 0 ping [^p]p <PART>>  
SFX e 0 king [^ck]k <PART>>  
SFX e 0 ding [^d]d <PART>>  
SFX e 0 bing [^b]b <PART>>  
SFX e 0 ring [^r]r <PART>>  
SFX e 0 sing [^s]s <PART>>  
SFX e 0 ting [^t]t <PART>>  
SFX e 0 ning [^n]n <PART>>  
SFX e 0 fing [^f]f <PART>>  
SFX e 0 ming [^m]m <PART>>  
SFX e 0 ling [^l]l <PART>>  
SFX e 0 ving [^v]v <PART>>  
SFX e 0 ging [^g]g <PART>>  

SFX b Y 1
SFX b 0 0 . >  

SFX a Y 1
SFX a 0 0 . >  

SFX w Y 6
SFX w 0 er [aciouxw] <COMP>>  
SFX w y iest y <SUPER>>  
SFX w e est e <SUPER>>  
SFX w y ier y <COMP>>  
SFX w e er e <COMP>>  
SFX w 0 est [aciouxw] <SUPER>>  

SFX f Y 1
SFX f 0 ing ge <PART>>  

SFX j Y 17
SFX j 0 s [bcdfgklmnprstvwxyz]y <PLUR>>  
SFX j 0 0 cs <PLUR>>  
SFX j 0 es [sc]h <PLUR>>  
SFX j 0 s [aeiou]y <PLUR>>  
SFX j 0 s oo <PLUR>>  
SFX j 0 s [^shoxy] <PLUR>>  
SFX j 0 es' x <PLUR><POSS>>  
SFX j 0 es [^c]s <PLUR>>  
SFX j 0 s [^sc]h <PLUR>>  
SFX j 0 es x <PLUR>>  
SFX j 0 s' [^shoxy] <PLUR><POSS>>  
SFX j 0 es' [^c]s <PLUR><POSS>>  
SFX j 0 s' [bcdfgklmnprstvwxyz]y <PLUR><POSS>>  
SFX j 0 es' [sc]h <PLUR><POSS>>  
SFX j 0 s' [aeiou]y <PLUR><POSS>>  
SFX j 0 s' oo <PLUR><POSS>>  
SFX j 0 s' [^sc]h <PLUR><POSS>>  

SFX l Y 4
SFX l fe ves fe <PLUR>>  
SFX l f ves' f <PLUR><POSS>>  
SFX l f ves f <PLUR>>  
SFX l fe ves' fe <PLUR><POSS>>  

SFX m Y 1
SFX m 0 ing [^ecxyw] <PART>>  

SFX v Y 1
SFX v 0 ed [^eycxw] <PAST><?PART>>  

SFX o Y 2
SFX o 0 es' [^o]o <PLUR><POSS>>  
SFX o 0 es [^o]o <PLUR>>  

SFX p Y 28
SFX p 0 ler [^l]l <COMP>>  
SFX p 0 pest [^p]p <SUPER>>  
SFX p 0 ker [^ck]k <COMP>>  
SFX p 0 ver [^v]v <COMP>>  
SFX p 0 ger [^g]g <COMP>>  
SFX p 0 ber [^b]b <COMP>>  
SFX p 0 kest [^ck]k <SUPER>>  
SFX p 0 rer [^r]r <COMP>>  
SFX p 0 ser [^s]s <COMP>>  
SFX p 0 dest [^d]d <SUPER>>  
SFX p 0 best [^b]b <SUPER>>  
SFX p 0 rest [^r]r <SUPER>>  
SFX p 0 sest [^s]s <SUPER>>  
SFX p 0 test [^t]t <SUPER>>  
SFX p 0 nest [^n]n <SUPER>>  
SFX p 0 der [^d]d <COMP>>  
SFX p 0 ter [^t]t <COMP>>  
SFX p 0 ner [^n]n <COMP>>  
SFX p 0 fest [^f]f <SUPER>>  
SFX p 0 mest [^m]m <SUPER>>  
SFX p 0 zest [^z]z <SUPER>>  
SFX p 0 fer [^f]f <COMP>>  
SFX p 0 lest [^l]l <SUPER>>  
SFX p 0 mer [^m]m <COMP>>  
SFX p 0 zer [^z]z <COMP>>  
SFX p 0 vest [^v]v <SUPER>>  
SFX p 0 gest [^g]g <SUPER>>  
SFX p 0 per [^p]p <COMP>>  

SFX q Y 2
SFX q 0 est [^ecxyw] <SUPER>>  
SFX q 0 er [^ecxyw] <COMP>>  

SFX r Y 14
SFX r 0 ded [^d]d <PAST><?PART>>  
SFX r 0 ted [^t]t <PAST><?PART>>  
SFX r 0 ned [^n]n <PAST><?PART>>  
SFX r 0 fed [^f]f <PAST><?PART>>  
SFX r 0 med [^m]m <PAST><?PART>>  
SFX r 0 zed [^z]z <PAST><?PART>>  
SFX r 0 ped [^p]p <PAST><?PART>>  
SFX r 0 led [^l]l <PAST><?PART>>  
SFX r 0 ked [^ck]k <PAST><?PART>>  
SFX r 0 ved [^v]v <PAST><?PART>>  
SFX r 0 ged [^g]g <PAST><?PART>>  
SFX r 0 bed [^b]b <PAST><?PART>>  
SFX r 0 red [^r]r <PAST><?PART>>  
SFX r 0 sed [^s]s <PAST><?PART>>  

SFX s Y 2
SFX s y ies [bcdfgklmnprstvwxyz]y <PLUR>>  
SFX s y ies' [bcdfgklmnprstvwxyz]y <PLUR><POSS>>  

SFX t Y 2
SFX t 0 's [^s] <POSS>>  
SFX t 0 ' s <POSS>>  
