data/english.dic
mad/paw~	mad_1<ADJ
fore/aw~	fore_1<ADJ
tense/aw~	tense_1<ADJ
sheaf/lhu~	sheaf_1<NOUN
wolf/lhu~	wolf_1<NOUN
big/paw~	big_1<ADJ
hymeneal/qwa~	hymeneal_1<ADJ
memorial/qwa~	memorial_1<ADJ
equilateral/qwa~	equilateral_1<ADJ
fail/jhu~	fail_1<NOUN
dim/paw~	dim_1<ADJ
trim/paw~	trim_1<ADJ
wan/paw~	wan_1<ADJ
dun/paw~	dun_1<ADJ
torpedo/uho~	torpedo_1<NOUN
halo/okhu~	halo_1<NOUN
hep/paw~	hip_1<ADJ
never-never/qwa~	never-never_1<ADJ
flat/paw~	flat_1<ADJ
unquiet/qwa~	unquiet_1<ADJ
fraught/qwa~	fraught_1<ADJ
fit/paw~	fit_1<ADJ
caw/jhu~	caw_1<NOUN
spray/jhu~	spray_1<NOUN
quinary/aw~	quinary_1<ADJ
cub/rdceb~	cub_2<VERB
dub/rdceb~	dub_2<VERB
catatonic/jhu~	catatonic_2<NOUN
age/fbcdg~	age_2<VERB
camouflage/dbcg~	camouflage_2<VERB
rummage/dbcg~	rummage_2<VERB
forage/dbcg~	forage_2<VERB
barrage/dbcg~	barrage_2<VERB
portage/dbcg~	portage_2<VERB
dodge/dbcg~	dodge_2<VERB
change/dbcg~	change_2<VERB
singe/fbcdg~	singe_2<VERB
tinge/fdcb~	tinge_2<VERB
sponge/dbcg~	sponge_2<VERB
stooge/dbcg~	stooge_2<VERB
upsurge/dbcg~	upsurge_2<VERB
sortie/bcd~	sortie_2<VERB
zone/bcd~	zone_2<VERB
shire/bcd~	shire_2<VERB
indenture/bcd~	indenture_2<VERB
cue/bcd~	cue_2<VERB
feeze/bcd~	feeze_2<VERB
coif/rdceb~	coif_2<VERB
dag/rdceb~	dag_2<VERB
sag/rdceb~	sag_2<VERB
wig/rdceb~	wig_2<VERB
zugzwang/mdcbv~	zugzwang_2<VERB
dog/rdceb~	dog_2<VERB
screech/mdcbv~	screech_2<VERB
ambush/mdcbv~	ambush_2<VERB
jack/mdcbv~	jack_2<VERB
wreck/mdcbv~	wreck_2<VERB
keek/mdcbv~	keek_2<VERB
cabal/rdceb~	cabal_2<VERB
canal/dcebmvr~	canal_2<VERB
coal/mdcbv~	coal_2<VERB
tunnel/dcebmvr~	tunnel_2<VERB
travail/mdcbv~	travail_2<VERB
pistol/dcebmvr~	pistol_2<VERB
trawl/mdcbv~	trawl_2<VERB
lam/rdceb~	lam_2<VERB
groan/mdcbv~	groan_2<VERB
metropolitan/jhu~	metropolitan_2<NOUN
chain/mdcbv~	chain_2<VERB
vein/mdcbv~	vein_2<VERB
billion/th~	billion_2<NOUN<PLUR>
garrison/mdcbv~	garrison_2<VERB
gun/rdceb~	gun_2<VERB
stucco/nidcb~	stucco_2<VERB
bunko/ibcd~	bunco_2<VERB
bunco/ibcd~	bunco_2<VERB
dado/ibcd~	dado_2<VERB
bastinado/ndcb~	bastinado_2<VERB
carbonado/ibcd~	carbonado_2<VERB
torpedo/ibcd~	torpedo_2<VERB
Roneo/nidcb~	Roneo_2<VERB
tango/ndcb~	tango_2<VERB
contango/ndcb~	contango_2<VERB
flamingo/okhu~	flamingo_2<NOUN
outgo/nbc~	outgo_2<VERB
tallyho/ibcd~	tally-ho_2<VERB
radio/ibcd~	radio_2<VERB
folio/hku~	folio_2<NOUN
halo/nidcb~	halo_2<VERB
hallo/ibcd~	halloo_2<VERB
kayo/ibcd~	kayo_2<VERB
hap/rdceb~	hap_2<VERB
slump/mdcbv~	slump_2<VERB
bop/rdceb~	bop_2<VERB
mop/rdceb~	mop_2<VERB
snoop/mdcbv~	snoop_2<VERB
slabber/mdcbv~	slobber_2<VERB
mountaineer/mdcbv~	mountaineer_2<VERB
chapter/mdcbv~	chapter_2<VERB
flatter/mdcbv~	flatter_2<VERB
palaver/mdcbv~	palaver_2<VERB
spur/rdceb~	spur_2<VERB
format/rdceb~	format_2<VERB
coat/mdcbv~	coat_2<VERB
socket/mdcbv~	socket_2<VERB
signet/mdcbv~	signet_2<VERB
pet/rdceb~	pet_2<VERB
dissent/mdcbv~	dissent_2<VERB
pinpoint/mdcbv~	pinpoint_2<VERB
shot/b~	shoot_2<VERB<PAST><?PART>>
fart/mdcbv~	fart_2<VERB
uppercut/bce~	uppercut_2<VERB
pillow/bcd~	pillow_2<VERB
reverberatory/shu~	reverberatory_2<NOUN
scrub/rdceb~	scrub_3<VERB
outspread/mbc~	outspread_3<VERB
same/jhu~	same_3<NOUN
till/mdcbv~	till_3<VERB
thin/rdceb~	thin_3<VERB
crescendo/ndcb~	crescendo_3<VERB
folio/ibcd~	folio_3<VERB
no/okhu~	no_3<NOUN
andantino/hku~	andantino_3<NOUN
zero/ndcb~	zero_3<VERB
ditto/ibcd~	ditto_3<VERB
half/lhu~	half_4<NOUN
harmonica/jhu~	harmonica<NOUN
taka/jhu~	taka<NOUN
plasmodesmata/th~	plasmodesma<NOUN<PLUR>
glib/paw~	glib<ADJ
succumb/mdcbv~	succumb<VERB
desorb/mdcbv~	desorb<VERB
blub/rdceb~	blub<VERB
stanzaic/qwa~	stanzaic<ADJ
lithographic/qwa~	lithographic<ADJ
orgasmic/qwa~	orgasmic<ADJ
amphictyonic/qwa~	amphictyonic<ADJ
blastoporal/qwa~	blastoporic<ADJ
Afro-Asiatic/qwa~	Afro-Asiatic<ADJ
poetical/qwa~	poetic<ADJ
freehanded/qwa~	free-handed<ADJ
unweighed/qwa~	unweighed<ADJ
self-disciplined/qwa~	self-disciplined<ADJ
wind-pollinated/qwa~	wind-pollinated<ADJ
ascend/mdcbv~	ascend<VERB
portend/mdcbv~	portend<VERB
sappanwood/jhu~	sappanwood<NOUN
plaice/hu~	plaice<NOUN
congruencies/th~	congruence<NOUN<PLUR>
reminisce/bcd~	reminisce<VERB
cree/jhu~	cree<NOUN
pruning-knife/lhu~	pruning-knife<NOUN
flick-knife/lhu~	flick-knife<NOUN
pocket-knife/lhu~	pocket-knife<NOUN
pocketknife/lhu~	pocketknife<NOUN
oldwife/lhu~	oldwife<NOUN
housewife/lhu~	housewife<NOUN
manage/dbcg~	manage<VERB
fidge/dbcg~	fidge<VERB
allege/dbcg~	allege<VERB
estrange/dbcg~	estrange<VERB
enlarge/dbcg~	enlarge<VERB
veil-like/aw~	veil-like<ADJ
imperishable/aw~	imperishable<ADJ
compile/bcd~	compile<VERB
infertile/aw~	infertile<ADJ
glosseme/jhu~	glosseme<NOUN
extine/jhu~	extine<NOUN
circumcise/bcd~	circumcise<VERB
tenement-house/jhu~	tenement-house<NOUN
nucleolated/qwa~	nucleolate<ADJ
acidulate/bcd~	acidulate<VERB
promote/bcd~	promote<VERB
feaze/bcd~	feaze<VERB
metallize/bcd~	metallize<VERB
contemporise/bcd~	contemporize<VERB
hyposensitise/bcd~	hyposensitize<VERB
donnés/th~	donnée<NOUN<PLUR>
rose-leaf/lhu~	rose-leaf<NOUN
broadleaf/lhu~	broadleaf<NOUN
cloverleaf/lhu~	cloverleaf<NOUN
elf/lhu~	elf<NOUN
aloof/qwa~	aloof<ADJ
mailsack/th~	mailbag<NOUN<PLUR>
smashing/qwa~	smashing<ADJ
coloring/jhu~	coloring<NOUN
welch/mdcbv~	welch<VERB
wetback/jhu~	wetback<NOUN
unpick/mdcbv~	unpick<VERB
moujik/th~	muzhik<NOUN<PLUR>
cusks/th~	cusk<NOUN<PLUR>
archeological/qwa~	archaeological<ADJ
proctological/qwa~	proctological<ADJ
lixivial/qwa~	lixivial<ADJ
brumal/qwa~	brumal<ADJ
outgeneral/dcebmvr~	outgeneral<VERB
trilingual/qwa~	trilingual<ADJ
impanel/dcebmvr~	empanel<VERB
cruel/paqw~	cruel<ADJ
red-pencil/dcebmvr~	red-pencil<VERB
upswell/mdcbv~	upswell<VERB
bulbul/jhu~	bulbul<NOUN
hypochondria/th~	hypochondrium<NOUN<PLUR>
glum/paw~	glum<ADJ
slogan/jhu~	slogan<NOUN
tryptophan/jhu~	tryptophan<NOUN
Numantian/qwa~	Numantian<ADJ
bushmen/th~	bushman<NOUN<PLUR>
freshen/mdcbv~	freshen<VERB
shaven/qwa~	shaven<ADJ
lanolins/th~	lanolin<NOUN<PLUR>
toksine/jhu~	toxin<NOUN
coacervation/jhu~	coacervation<NOUN
prohibition/jhu~	prohibition<NOUN
bimbo/hku~	bimbo<NOUN
hobo/okhu~	hobo<NOUN
chico/hku~	chico<NOUN
calico/okhu~	calico<NOUN
amontillado/hku~	amontillado<NOUN
bravado/okhu~	bravado<NOUN
uredo/hu~	uredo<NOUN
undo/nbc~	undo<VERB
foredo/nbc~	fordo<VERB
outdo/nbc~	outdo<VERB
udo/hku~	udo<NOUN
farrago/uho~	farrago<NOUN
eryngo/okhu~	eryngo<NOUN
forgo/nbc~	forgo<VERB
Idaho/hku~	Idaho<NOUN
re-echo/ndcb~	re-echo<VERB
plonko/hku~	plonko<NOUN
catalo/okhu~	cattalo<NOUN
commo/hku~	commo<NOUN
kakapo/hku~	kakapo<NOUN
anti-hero/uho~	anti-hero<NOUN
sayso/hku~	say-so<NOUN
pronunciamento/hku~	pronunciamento<NOUN
manifesto/okhu~	manifesto<NOUN
Tokyo/hku~	Tokyo<NOUN
skinnydip/rdceb~	skinny-dip<VERB
sharecrop/rdceb~	sharecrop<VERB
chedarim/th~	cheder<NOUN<PLUR>
disconsider/mdcbv~	disconsider<VERB
electioneer/mdcbv~	electioneer<VERB
dispeller/jhu~	dispeller<NOUN
frightener/jhu~	frightener<NOUN
raster/jhu~	raster<NOUN
haver/mdcbv~	haver<VERB
lachrymator/th~	lacrimator<NOUN<PLUR>
plexor/jhu~	plexor<NOUN
thermionics/jhu~	thermionics<NOUN
lewises/th~	lewis<NOUN<PLUR>
dominations/hu~	dominations<NOUN
tasteless/qwa~	tasteless<ADJ
mercifulness/jhu~	mercifulness<NOUN
callousness/jhu~	callousness<NOUN
cumulus/hu~	cumulus<NOUN
overserious/a~	over-serious<ADJ
unisonous/qwa~	unisonous<ADJ
walrus/th~	walrus<NOUN<PLUR>
detect/mdcbv~	detect<VERB
submit/rdceb~	submit<VERB
transmit/rdceb~	transmit<VERB
complacent/qwa~	complacent<ADJ
Stockport/jhu~	Stockport<NOUN
outlast/mdcbv~	outlast<VERB
topiarist/jhu~	topiarist<NOUN
billetsdoux/th~	billet-doux<NOUN<PLUR>
carby/shu~	carby<NOUN
idiocy/shu~	idiocy<NOUN
logy/aw~	logy<ADJ
phenology/shu~	phenology<NOUN
stenography/shu~	stenography<NOUN
autonomy/shu~	autonomy<NOUN
actinotherapy/shu~	actinotherapy<NOUN
ornithoscopy/shu~	ornithoscopy<NOUN
missilery/shu~	missilery<NOUN
bayberry/shu~	bayberry<NOUN
pharmacognosy/shu~	pharmacognosy<NOUN
edacity/shu~	edacity<NOUN
irreproachability/shu~	irreproachability<NOUN
equanimity/shu~	equanimity<NOUN
